Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
ADMINISTRATIVE DISSOLUTION

7-134-201. Grounds for administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 726, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) amended, p. 985, § 90, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2348, § 325, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1514, § 307, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-134-202. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 726, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 985, § 91, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 2348, § 326, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-134-203. Reinstatement following administrative dissolution - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 727, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 985, § 92, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1857, § 147, effective July 1; IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1722, § 149, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(5) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-134-204. Appeal from denial of reinstatement - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 728, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(5) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-134-205. Continuation as unincorporated association. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 728, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2349, § 327, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.